Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.370

Annexation of city or town into library district—Special election procedure.

The county legislative authority or authorities shall by resolution call a special election to be held in such city or town at the next special election date according to RCW 29A.04.321, and shall cause notice of such election to be given as provided for in RCW 29A.52.355.

The election on the annexation of the city or town into the library district shall be conducted by the auditor of the county or counties in which the city or town is located in accordance with the general election laws of the state and the results thereof shall be canvassed by the canvassing board of the county or counties. No person shall be entitled to vote at such election unless he or she is registered to vote in said city or town for at least thirty days preceding the date of the election. The ballot proposition shall be in substantially the following form:

"Shall the city or town of . . . . . . be annexed to and be a part of . . . . . . library district?

YES

. . . .

□

NO

. . . .

□"

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote in favor thereof, the city or town shall thereupon be annexed and shall be a part of such library district.

[ 2011 c 10 s 78; 2006 c 344 s 19; 1982 c 123 s 14; 1977 ex.s. c 353 s 2.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.